Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.400

Running start program—Existing agreements not affected.

RCW 28A.600.300 through 28A.600.390 are in addition to and not intended to adversely affect agreements between school districts and institutions of higher education in effect on April 11, 1990.

[ 2023 c 350 s 4; 1994 c 205 s 11; 1990 1st ex.s. c 9 s 412.]

NOTES:

Finding—Severability—1990 1st ex.s. c 9: See notes following RCW 28A.225.220.